Utah statutes.
54-15-105.   No additional fee or charge without governing authority
approval -- Exception.
(1)  An electrical corporation administering a net metering program may not
charge a customer participating in the program an additional standby,
capacity, interconnection, or other fee or charge unless the governing
authority, after appropriate notice and opportunity for public comment:
(a)  determines that:
(i)  the electrical corporation will incur direct costs from the
interconnection or from administering the net metering program that exceed
benefits, as determined by the governing authority, resulting from the
program; and
(ii)  public policy is best served by imposing a reasonable fee or charge on
the customer participating in the net metering program rather than by
allocating the fee or charge among the electrical corporation's entire
customer base; and
(b)  after making its determination under Subsection (1)(a), authorizes the
additional reasonable fee or charge.
(2)  If a cost of a net metering program is allocated among the electrical
corporation's entire customer base, Subsection (1) may not be construed to
prohibit an electrical corporation from charging a customer participating in
the net metering program for that cost to the same extent that the electrical
corporation charges a customer not participating in the program for that cost.
